Illinois, session 104th, SB2923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-360 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-360 new)8    Sec. 205-360. Access to nutritious food program.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Food desert" means an underserved geographic area where 11fresh and nutritious foods are difficult to obtain, as 12determined by the Department. "Food desert" includes:13        (1) a rural town or urban neighborhood in which:14            (A) at least 25% of the households have incomes 15        that are below the federal income poverty level; or16            (B) the median family income of residents is not 17        more than 80% of the median family income of Illinois;18        (2) a rural town, urban neighborhood, or metropolitan 19    census tract in which at least 500 residents or at least 20    33% of the population resides more than one mile from a 21    supermarket or large grocery store; or22        (3) a nonmetropolitan census tract in which at least 23    500 residents or at least 33% of the population resides   SB2923- 2 -LRB104 19125 WRO 32570 b1    more than 10 miles from a supermarket or large grocery 2    store.3    "Program" refers to the access to nutritious food program 4conducted under this Section.5    (b) The Department shall conduct an access to nutritious 6food program to establish and operate projects and strategies 7within food deserts that focus on:8        (1) distribution of fresh and nutritious food; and9        (2) education in food preparation and nutrition.10    (c) The Department shall promote the sharing of 11information concerning best practices and programs, including 12projects established under this Section, that have proven to 13be effective in improving distribution of fresh and nutritious 14food and education in food preparation and nutrition.15    (d) The Department shall convene an annual meeting of 16nonprofit organizations and other interested parties to share 17best practices and information on programs, including projects 18established under this Section, that have proven to be 19effective in improving distribution of fresh and nutritious 20food and education in food preparation and nutrition.